New York, session 2025-2026, A8907.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Prohibiting Elevation of Notorious Names (PENN) Act". 3 § 2. Article 50 and sections 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1003 of the execu- 4 tive law, as renumbered by chapter 770 of the laws of 1978, are renum- 5 bered article 60 and sections 1500, 1501, 1502 and 1503. 6 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 50 to read 7 as follows: 8 ARTICLE 50 9 NAMING OF PUBLIC FACILITIES 10 Section 1000. Naming of public facilities. 11 § 1000. Naming of public facilities. 1. As used in this section: 12 (a) "public facility" means a building or other real property owned by 13 the state or a political subdivision of the state; and 14 (b) "public officer" means a person elected to public office or any 15 person appointed or employed by the state or a political subdivision of 16 the state. 17 2. A public facility shall not be named for a public officer during 18 the period in which that person is a public officer. 19 3. A public facility shall not be named for a public officer who has 20 been convicted of a felony. The state shall remove the name from a 21 public facility named for such person immediately upon conviction, 22 whether or not another name has been offered or approved for substi- 23 tution and renaming. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11938-01-5 A. 8907 2 1 4. A public facility that has been named for a person who was not a 2 public officer at the time of the naming may continue to bear that name 3 if the person subsequently becomes a public officer. 4 5. Except as provided in subdivision three of this section, a public 5 facility named for a public officer prior to the effective date of this 6 section may continue to bear the name of that public officer. 7 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.